Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.025

Community engagement boards—Membership—Duties.

(1) For purposes of this chapter, "community engagement board" means a board established pursuant to a memorandum of understanding between a juvenile court and a school district and composed of members of the local community in which the child attends school. Community engagement boards must include members who receive training regarding the identification of barriers to school attendance, the use of the Washington assessment of the risks and needs of students (WARNS) or other assessment tools to identify the specific needs of individual children, cultural responsive interactions, trauma-informed approaches to discipline, evidence-based treatments that have been found effective in supporting at-risk youth and their families, and the specific services and treatment available in the particular school, court, community, and elsewhere. Duties of a community engagement board shall include, but not be limited to: Identifying barriers to school attendance, recommending methods for improving attendance such as connecting students and their families with community services, culturally appropriate promising practices, and evidence-based services such as functional family therapy, suggesting to the school district that the child enroll in another school, an alternative education program, an education center, a skill center, a dropout prevention program, or another public or private educational program, or recommending to the juvenile court that a juvenile be offered the opportunity for placement in a HOPE center or crisis residential center, if appropriate.

(2) The legislature finds that utilization of community engagement boards is the preferred means of intervention when preliminary methods to eliminate or reduce unexcused absences as required by RCW 28A.225.020 have not been effective in securing the child's attendance at school. The legislature intends to encourage and support the development and expansion of community engagement boards. Operation of a school truancy board does not excuse a district from the obligation of filing a petition within the requirements of RCW 28A.225.015(3).

[ 2021 c 119 s 10; 2017 c 291 s 3; 2016 c 205 s 5; 2009 c 266 s 2; 1999 c 319 s 5; 1996 c 134 s 9; 1995 c 312 s 66.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 119 ss 7-15: See note following RCW 28A.225.030.

Findings—Intent—2021 c 119: See note following RCW 28A.225.007.

Short title—1995 c 312: See note following RCW 13.32A.010.